Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4160.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 339.405 is amended to read:
339.405. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Evacuate” means a procedure used when students and staff need to move from one location
to another.
(b) “Hold” means a procedure used to keep students and staff in classrooms while a disruption
or minor emergency is resolved.
(c) “Lockdown” means a procedure used when a threat or hazard is inside the building.
(d) “Secure” means a procedure used when a threat or hazard is outside the building.
(e) “Shelter in place” is a procedure used to respond to and take protective actions based on a
threat or hazard that may include an earthquake, tsunami or other natural or environmental hazard.
(2) Each school district must maintain a comprehensive safety program for all students and staff.
The program must include procedures for:
(a) Responding to emergency situations that address an immediate threat to safety, including
an evacuation, a hold, a lockdown, a secure and a shelter in place;
(b) Providing communicable disease management;
(c) Responding to medical emergencies, including a cardiac emergency response plan that
complies with ORS 339.345; and
(d) Providing instruction as described in ORS 339.408.
(3) The State Board of Education may adopt rules related to a program required under this
section.
SECTION 2. ORS 339.345 is amended to read:
339.345. [Each school campus in a school district, private school campus and public charter school
campus shall have on the premises at least one automated external defibrillator.] Every kindergarten
through grade 12 public or private school is required to have a plan for cardiac emergency
responses. The plan must:
(1) To the greatest extent practicable, align with core elements established by a national
organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care.
(2) Include the provision of at least one automated external defibrillator at the school.
(3) Provide for the placement of automated external defibrillators in a manner that:
(a) To the greatest extent practicable, is in accordance with guidelines established by a
national organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care; and
Enrolled House Bill 4160 (HB 4160-A) Page 1

(b) Is in locations that are clearly identified, unlocked and accessible when:
(A) Students are at school; and
(B) Students are at athletic practices or competitions at the school.
(4) Establish a procedure for the sharing of the locations of automated external
defibrillators at the school with local emergency medical services providers.
(5) Require the maintenance and testing of automated external defibrillators at the
school as provided by the manufacturer’s guidelines.
(6) Require every coach, as defined in ORS 336.485, and other appropriate staff, as de-
termined by the school, to be trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of auto-
mated external defibrillators.
(7) Provide for an annual review of the plan and review of whether the school is in
compliance with the plan.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 339.345 and 339.405 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2026
Act first apply to the 2027-2028 school year.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on July 1, 2027.
Passed by House February 19, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4160 (HB 4160-A) Page 2